Maryland, session 2026, SB0319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0319*

SENATE BILL 319
(1) the Social Services Administration of the Department; or
(2) any other unit within the Department to which the Secretary of Human
Services has delegated in writing specified responsibilities of the Administration under this
subtitle.
5–525.4.
(A) ONLY IN LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCES, WHERE THE ADMINISTRATION
FINDS IT APPROPRIATE, MAY ACTION BE TAKEN TO SECURE AN ASSIGNMENT TO THE
STATE OF ANY RIGHTS TO SUPPORT ON BEHALF OF A CHILD RECEIVING FOSTER
CARE MAINTENANCE PAYMENTS UNDER THIS PART III OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY TAKE ACTION, WHEN APPROPRIATE, TO
DISCONTINUE AN ASSIGNMENT OF RIGHTS TO SUPPORT AND TERMINATE EXISTING
SUPPORT ORDERS FOR A CHILD RECEIVING FOSTER CARE MAINTENANCE
PAYMENTS.
(C) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL ADOPT RULES AND
REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
12–104.
(a) The court may modify a child support award subsequent to the filing of a
motion for modification and upon a showing of a material change of circumstance.
(b) The court may not retroactively modify a child support award prior to the date
of the filing of the motion for modification.
(c) If a party becomes incarcerated, the court may determine that a material
change of circumstance warranting a modification of child support has occurred, provided
that the party’s ability to pay child support is sufficiently reduced due to incarceration.
12–104.2.
THE COURT SHALL TERMINATE A CHILD SUPPORT ORDER THAT WAS
PREVIOUSLY ESTABLISHED OR ASSIGNED FOR A CHILD RECEIVING A FOSTER CARE
MAINTENANCE PAYMENT, WITHOUT A SHOWING OF A MATERIAL CHANGE OF
CIRCUMSTANCE, ON THE FILING FOR A TERMINATION BY THE CHILD SUPPORT
ADMINISTRATION, LOCAL OFFICE OF CHILD SUPPORT, OR LOCAL DEPARTMENT,
AFTER THE SOCIAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATION OR ITS DESIGNEE DETERMINES
THAT THE ORDER IS NO LONGER APPROPRIATE.

SENATE BILL 319 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.